Ohio, session 136, HB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.668 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.668. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, the eastbound and westbound lanes of United States route number twenty-two between the eastern border of Harrison county and the intersection of state route number one hundred fifty-one, in Harrison county, shall be known as the "PFC Thomas "Tommy" Pizzino Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.